Nebraska, session 109, LB1229.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1229 LB1229
2026 2026
Section 1. The Rural Health Transformation Fund is created. The
State Treasurer shall credit to the fund any money received from the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the Rural Health
Transformation Program that was authorized by the One Big Beautiful Bill
Act, Section 71401 of Public Law 119-21. The money in the fund shall be
expended for purposes authorized by the federal law and no other purpose.
No transfers to any other fund or program of state government shall be
authorized by the Legislature, and no other use of such money shall be
implemented by the Governor. The state investment officer shall invest
any money in the fund available for investment pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Investment earnings shall be credited to the fund.
Sec. 2. (1) Any application on behalf of the State of Nebraska for
funds from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the
Rural Health Transformation Program that was authorized by the One Big
Beautiful Bill Act, Section 71401 of Public Law 119-21, shall be
electronically reported to the Clerk of the Legislature. Any expenditure
of money received pursuant to an application shall be limited to the uses
approved in the application. The applicant shall post all awards, direct
and indirect, and all grants on the website of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
(2) The applicant shall electronically report all expenditures of
such money to the Clerk of the Legislature on an annual basis. The report
shall include a list of all beneficiaries that includes direct awards and
indirect awards passed through from the direct awards and any outcomes
and metrics collected.
(3) The Clerk of the Legislature shall post all information received
under this section on the website of the Legislature.
Sec. 3. No expenditure of money from the Rural Health
Transformation Fund shall supplant state rural health spending from the
prior fiscal year. Any initiative which applies to receive any money from
-2-

LB1229 LB1229
2026 2026
the fund shall receive approval for a sustainability plan prior to
distribution of any money.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-